dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="x/itan__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>itan</l><r>itan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jatan</l><r>itan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jaten</l><r>itan<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tw/il__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>il</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al</l><r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ber/ġa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eġ</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/aħal__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħal</l><r>aħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħula</l><r>aħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/abar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abar</l><r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bura</l><r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obra</l><r>abar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/erriegħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erriegħa</l><r>erriegħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieragħ</l><r>erriegħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/erkin__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>erkin</l><r>erkin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieken</l><r>erkin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/ifen__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ifen</l><r>ifen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ifna</l><r>ifen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/erbut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erbut</l><r>erbut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebat</l><r>erbut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebet</l><r>erbut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ejn__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejn</l><r>ejn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jun</l><r>ejn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ebut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ebut</l><r>ebut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiebet</l><r>ebut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/erħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erħa</l><r>erħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieħi</l><r>erħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/axix__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>axix</l><r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>xejjex</l><r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/tieb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>tieb</l><r>tieb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>otba</l><r>tieb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/aqrut__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aqrut</l><r>aqrut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qaret</l><r>aqrut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/elb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>elb</l><r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lieb</l><r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ft/ira__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajjar</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/arsa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arsa</l><r>arsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ras</l><r>arsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tib/na__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/ozz__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ozz</l><r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zuz</l><r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/orma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orma</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orom</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rum</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ikħal__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ikħal</l><r>ikħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>koħol</l><r>ikħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/inna__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>inna</l><r>inna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nien</l><r>inna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/aġeb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aġeb</l><r>aġeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oġġieba</l><r>aġeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beż/buża__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>buża</l><r>buża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bżie</l><r>buża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/appun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>appun</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>papan</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>papen</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/arpell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arpell</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rapel</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riepel</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gid/ba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eb</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/arruta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arruta</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raret</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieret</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/ama__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ama</l><r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omja</l><r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="toq/ba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ob</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/ajn__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ajn</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejun</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ewt__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ewt</l><r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiet</l><r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kb/ir__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/iblah__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iblah</l><r>iblah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>boloh</l><r>iblah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/aħħar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħħar</l><r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaħar</l><r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/arfusa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arfusa</l><r>arfusa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rafes</l><r>arfusa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/onq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>onq</l><r>onq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enuq</l><r>onq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ċorma"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/orma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xitan"><i>x</i><par n="x/itan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għonq"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/onq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mewt"><i>m</i><par n="m/ewt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tqil"><i>tq</i><par n="tw/il__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kanna"><i>kan</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tibna"><i>tib</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tebut"><i>t</i><par n="t/ebut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaġeb"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/aġeb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sfinġa"><i>sfin</i><par n="ber/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għajn"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ajn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ktieb"><i>k</i><par n="k/tieb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġifen"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ifen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għama"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ama__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żerriegħa"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/erriegħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dejn"><i>d</i><par n="d/ejn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gaġġa"><i>gaġ</i><par n="ber/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raħal"><i>r</i><par n="r/aħal__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħotba"><i>ħot</i><par n="toq/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kobba"><i>kob</i><par n="toq/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="vleġġa"><i>vleġ</i><par n="ber/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ftira"><i>ft</i><par n="ft/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċarruta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/arruta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħaxix"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/axix__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serkin"><i>s</i><par n="s/erkin__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qabar"><i>q</i><par n="q/abar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żgħir"><i>żgħ</i><par n="kb/ir__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="twil"><i>tw</i><par n="tw/il__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ikħal"><i></i><par n="/ikħal__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gozz"><i>g</i><par n="g/ozz__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="darsa"><i>d</i><par n="d/arsa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serbut"><i>s</i><par n="s/erbut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpell"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerna"><i>ċer</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kelb"><i>k</i><par n="k/elb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gidba"><i>gid</i><par n="gid/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beżbuża"><i>beż</i><par n="beż/buża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kbir"><i>kb</i><par n="kb/ir__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="karfusa"><i>k</i><par n="k/arfusa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="girna"><i>gir</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="terħa"><i>t</i><par n="t/erħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sinna"><i>s</i><par n="s/inna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pinna"><i>pin</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="berġa"><i>ber</i><par n="ber/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għadira"><i>għad</i><par n="ft/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="saħħar"><i>s</i><par n="s/aħħar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maqrut"><i>m</i><par n="m/aqrut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="iblah"><i></i><par n="/iblah__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wilġa"><i>wil</i><par n="ber/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappun"><i>k</i><par n="k/appun__n_GD"/></e>
